Utah statutes.
77-21-1.   Short title -- Construction.
This chapter may be cited as the "Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of
Witnesses from Without a State in Criminal Proceedings." It shall be
interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform
the law of the states which enact it.
